Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-514
Sale, lease, or transfer; promotion expenditures; failure to file statement; penalty.

Any person, firm, association or corporation who shall fail or refuse to file such statement, or who shall subscribe to such statement, knowing the same to be false, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Initiative Law 1930, No. 324, § 8;

Laws 1931, c. 116, § 8, p. 341;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-608;

R.S.1943, § 70-514;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 139.